District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.13

Reports to the Mayor and the Council.

On or before December 29th of each year, the Corporation shall submit to the Mayor and the Council a report that sets forth for the prior fiscal year its operations and accomplishments, revenues and expenses, assets and liabilities at the end of the fiscal year, and the status of reserves, depreciation, and special, sinking, or other funds.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5124, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5016 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5016 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation reporting requirements to Council, see § 5016 of D.C. Law 19-168.